Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7849.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 6 of the General Laws entitled "COMMERCIAL LAW — GENERAL
REGULATORY PROVISIONS" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 13.4
SURVEILLANCE PRICING AND ONLINE RETAILING
6-13.4-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) "Algorithmic price increase" means any act of charging a price for a good or service
that is higher than the seller's baseline price where:
(i) The seller uses an automated algorithm, artificial intelligence, or other data processing
system; and
(ii) The price is determined by, or materially influenced by, personal data tied to or
reasonably identifiable to an individual consumer, including but not limited to geolocation, device
identifiers, browsing or purchase history, demographics, or past purchases.
(2) "Baseline price" means the price the seller would charge for the same good or service
at the same point in time under a uniform pricing policy that does not incorporate individualized
personal data analysis.
(3) "Personal data" has the meaning given in § 6-48.1-2 and includes any information that
identifies or could reasonably be linked to a specific consumer or device.

(4) "Online retailer" means any person or entity selling goods or services through an
internet website, mobile application, or other digital platform.
(5) "Price decrease" means any reduction below the seller's baseline price, including
discounts, promotions, volume pricing, loyalty rewards, or time-limited offers.
6-13.4-2. Prohibition.
(a) No online retailer operating or offering goods or services for sale in this state shall
knowingly apply an algorithmic price increase in the sale of goods or services to consumers in
Rhode Island.
(b) This prohibition does not restrict:
(1) Price decreases as defined in § 6-13.4-1;
(2) Dynamic pricing based on general market conditions, inventory, time-of-day, or other
factors not incorporating individualized personal data; or
(3) Pricing practices otherwise permitted under federal law.
6-13.4-3. Transparency notice.
(a) When a price offered to a consumer is influenced by personal data in a manner not
prohibited by § 16-13.4-2, the online retailer shall display a clear and conspicuous disclosure near
the price stating:
"THIS PRICE MAY BE INFLUENCED BY DYNAMIC PRICING FACTORS SUCH AS
MARKET CONDITIONS, INVENTORY OR TIMING OF SALE."
(b) This disclosure is not required when the price offered is a price decrease.
6-13.4-4. Enforcement.
(a) A violation of this chapter shall constitute a deceptive trade practice prohibited pursuant
to § 6-13.1-2.
(b) The attorney general may enforce this chapter pursuant to the provisions of chapter 13.1
of title 6 (Rhode Island deceptive trade practices act), including by seeking injunctive relief and
civil penalties.
6-13.4-5. Civil penalties.
(a) Violations of this chapter may result in civil penalties of up to one hundred dollars
($100) per violation.
(b) Each instance of noncompliance shall constitute a separate violation.
6-13.4-6. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter is held invalid, the remainder shall remain in effect.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
LC005691 - Page 2 of 4

========
LC005691
========
LC005691 - Page 3 of 4